California statutes. Public Resources Code
(a) When a project is to be carried out or approved by two or more public agencies, the determination of whether the project may have a significant effect on the environment shall be made by the lead agency, and that agency shall prepare, or cause to be prepared by contract, the environmental impact report for the project, if a report is required by this division. In the event that a dispute arises as to which is the lead agency, any of the disputing public agencies, or in the case of a project described in subdivision (c) of Section 21065 the applicant for such project, may submit the question to the Office of Planning and Research, and the Office of Planning and Research shall designate, within 21 days of receiving the request, the lead agency, giving due consideration to the capacity of that agency to adequately fulfill the requirements of this division.

(b) For the purposes of this section, a “dispute” means a contested, active difference of opinion between two or more public agencies as to which of those agencies shall prepare any necessary environmental document. A dispute exists where each of those agencies claims that it either has or does not have the obligation to prepare that environmental document. The Office of Planning and Research shall not designate a lead agency in the absence of such a dispute.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 267, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

21166.

When an environmental impact report has been prepared for a project pursuant to this division, no subsequent or supplemental environmental impact report shall be required by the lead agency or by any responsible agency, unless one or more of the following events occurs:

(a) Substantial changes are proposed in the project which will require major revisions of the environmental impact report.

(b) Substantial changes occur with respect to the circumstances under which the project is being undertaken which will require major revisions in the environmental impact report.

(c) New information, which was not known and could not have been known at the time the environmental impact report was certified as complete, becomes available.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1200.)
-------------------------------------------

21166.1.

The decision of a lead agency to prepare an environmental impact report with respect to environmental impacts within a geographic area or for a group of projects shall not be a basis for determining that an environmental document prepared for an individual project within that area or group is inadequate.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1514, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

21166.2.

Notwithstanding Section 21166, the environmental review set forth in the Final Environmental Impact Report for the Lower Klamath Project License Surrender (State Clearinghouse No. 2016122047) issued in April 2020 in combination with other environmental review documents related to removal of facilities on the Klamath River prepared and adopted by the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission pursuant to the federal National Environmental Policy Act of 1969 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 321 et seq.) shall be conclusively presumed to satisfy the requirements of this division for any project for the removal of hydroelectric dams and associated facilities, along with associated restoration of formerly inundated lands, hatchery modifications, and implementation of mitigation measures in the Klamath River Basin, undertaken or approved by a public agency
 if all of the following apply:

(a) The dams proposed to be removed are upstream of a river segment designated as a wild river, a scenic river, or a recreational river pursuant to the California Wild and Scenic Rivers Act (Chapter 1.4 (commencing with Section 5093.50) of Division 5).

(b) There are no downstream dams on the same river, other than the dams proposed to be removed as a part of the same project that are significant barriers to fish passage.

(c) The lead agency certified or adopted the environmental review document prepared under this division and approved the project at least 180 days before the effective date of this section and no action or proceeding challenging the lead agency’s approval was commenced within the applicable statute of limitations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 258, Sec. 24.   (SB 155)   Effective September 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

21166.3.

Notwithstanding Section 21166, the environmental review set forth in the Final Programmatic Environmental Impact Report for the Hollister Ranch Coastal Access Program, in combination with other environmental review documents related to the provision of public access to, and along the coastline of, Hollister Ranch in the County of Santa Barbara as required by Section 30610.81, shall be conclusively presumed to satisfy this division for any project to effectuate public access and associated facilities undertaken or approved by a public agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 574, Sec. 25.   (AB 211)   Effective September 27, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

21167.

An action or proceeding to attack, review, set aside, void, or annul the following acts or decisions of a public agency on the grounds of noncompliance with this division shall be commenced as follows:

(a) An action or proceeding alleging that a public agency is carrying out or has approved a project that may have a significant effect on the environment without having determined whether the project may have a significant effect on the environment shall be commenced within 180 days from the date of the public agency’s decision to carry out or approve the project, or, if a project is undertaken without a formal decision by the public agency, within 180 days from the date of commencement of the project.

(b) An action or proceeding alleging that a public agency has improperly determined whether a project may have a significant effect on the environment shall be commenced within 30 days from the date of the filing of the notice required by subdivision (a) of Section 21108 or subdivision (a) of Section 21152.

(c) An action or proceeding alleging that an environmental impact report does not comply with this division shall be commenced within 30 days from the date of the filing of the notice required by subdivision (a) of Section 21108 or subdivision (a) of Section 21152 by the lead agency.

(d) An action or proceeding alleging that a public agency has improperly determined that a project is not subject to this division pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 21080 shall be commenced within 35 days from the date of the filing by the public agency, or person specified in subdivision (b) or (c) of Section 21065, of the notice authorized by subdivision (b) of Section 21108 or subdivision (b) of Section 21152. If the notice has not been filed, the action or proceeding shall be commenced within 180 days from the date of the public agency’s decision to carry out or approve the project, or, if a project is undertaken without a formal decision by the public agency, within 180 days from the date of commencement of the project.

(e) An action or proceeding alleging that another act or omission of a public agency does not comply with this division shall be commenced within 30 days from the date of the filing of the notice required by subdivision (a) of Section 21108 or subdivision (a) of Section 21152.

(f) If a person has made a written request to the public agency for a copy of the notice specified in Section 21108 or 21152 before the date on which the agency approves or determines to carry out the project, then not later than five days from the date of the agency’s action, the public agency shall deposit a written copy of the notice addressed to that person in the United States mail, first class postage prepaid. The date upon which this notice is mailed shall not affect the time periods specified in subdivisions (b), (c), (d), and (e).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 38, Sec. 1.   (AB 2965)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

21167.1.

(a) In all actions or proceedings brought pursuant to Sections 21167, 21168, and 21168.5, including the hearing of an action or proceeding on appeal from a decision of a lower court, all courts in which the action or proceeding is pending shall give the action or proceeding preference over all other civil actions, in the matter of setting the action or proceeding for hearing or trial, and in hearing or trying the action or proceeding, so that the action or proceeding shall be quickly heard and determined. The court shall regulate the briefing schedule so that, to the extent feasible, the court shall commence hearings on an appeal within one year of the date of the filing of the appeal.

(b) To ensure that actions or proceedings brought pursuant to Sections 21167, 21168, and 21168.5 may be quickly heard and determined in the lower courts, the superior courts in all counties with a population of more than 200,000 shall designate one or more judges to develop expertise in this division and related land use and environmental laws, so that those judges will be available to hear, and quickly resolve, actions or proceedings brought pursuant to Sections 21167, 21168, and 21168.5.

(c) In an action or proceeding filed pursuant to this chapter that is joined with any other cause of action, the court, upon a motion by any party, may grant severance of the actions. In determining whether to grant severance, the court shall consider such matters as judicial economy, administrative economy, and prejudice to any party.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 578.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

21167.2.

If no action or proceeding alleging that an environmental impact report does not comply with the provisions of this division is commenced during the period prescribed in subdivision (c) of Section 21167, the environmental impact report shall be conclusively presumed to comply with the provisions of this division for purposes of its use by responsible agencies, unless the provisions of Section 21166 are applicable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1200.)
-------------------------------------------

21167.3.

(a) If an action or proceeding alleging that an environmental impact report or a negative declaration does not comply with the provisions of this division is commenced during the period described in subdivision (b) or (c) of Section 21167, and if an injunction or stay is issued prohibiting the project from being carried out or approved pending final determination of the issue of such compliance, responsible agencies shall assume that the environmental impact report or the negative declaration for the project does comply with the provisions of this division and shall issue a conditional approval or disapproval of such project according to the timetable for agency action in Article 5 (commencing with Section 65950) of Chapter 4.5 of Division 1 of Title 7 of the Government Code. A conditional approval shall constitute permission to proceed with a project when and only when such action or proceeding results in a final determination that the environmental impact report or negative declaration does comply with the provisions of this division.

(b) In the event that an action or proceeding is commenced as described in subdivision (a) but no injunction or similar relief is sought and granted, responsible agencies shall assume that the environmental impact report or negative declaration for the project does comply with the provisions of this division and shall approve or disapprove the project according to the timetable for agency action in Article 5 (commencing with Section 65950) of Chapter 4.5 of Division 1 of Title 7 of the Government Code. Such approval shall constitute permission to proceed with the project at the applicant’s risk pending final determination of such action or proceeding.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 131, Sec. 2.   Effective May 28, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

21167.4.

(a) In any action or proceeding alleging noncompliance with this division, the petitioner shall request a hearing within 90 days from the date of filing the petition or shall be subject to dismissal on the court’s own motion or on the motion of any party interested in the action or proceeding.

(b) The petitioner shall serve a notice of the request for a hearing on all parties at the time that the petitioner files the request for a hearing.

(c) Upon the filing of a request by the petitioner for a hearing and upon application by any party, the court shall establish a briefing schedule and a hearing date. In the absence of good cause,
 briefing shall be completed within 90 days from the date that the request for a hearing is filed, and the hearing, to the extent feasible, shall be held within 30 days thereafter. Good cause may include, but shall not be limited to, the conduct of discovery, determination of the completeness of the record of proceedings, the complexity of the issues, and the length of the record of proceedings and the timeliness of its production. The parties may stipulate to a briefing schedule or hearing date that differs from the schedule set forth in this subdivision if the stipulation is approved by the court.

(d) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2016.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 5) and added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 496, Sec. 6.   (SB 1456)   Effective September 29, 2010.   Section operative January 1, 2016, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

21167.5.

Proof of prior service by mail upon the public agency carrying out or approving the project of a written notice of the commencement of any action or proceeding described in Section 21167 identifying the project shall be filed concurrently with the initial pleading in such action or proceeding.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1154.)
-------------------------------------------

21167.6.

Notwithstanding any other law, in all actions or proceedings brought pursuant to Section 21167, except as provided in Section 21167.6.2 or those involving the Public Utilities Commission, all of the following shall apply:

(a) At the time that the action or proceeding is filed, the plaintiff or petitioner shall file a request that the respondent public agency prepare the record of proceedings relating to the subject of the action or proceeding. The request, together with the complaint or petition, shall be served personally upon the public agency not later than 10 business days from the date that the action or proceeding was filed.

(b) (1) (A) The public agency shall prepare
 and certify the record of proceedings not later than 60 days from the date that the request specified in subdivision (a) was served upon the public agency. Upon certification, the public agency shall lodge an electronic copy of the record of proceedings with the court and shall serve on the parties notice that the record of proceedings has been certified and lodged with the court. The parties shall pay any reasonable costs or fees imposed for the preparation of the record of proceedings in conformance with any law or rule of court.

(B) The court shall schedule a case management conference within 30 days of the filing of the complaint or petition pursuant to this division to review the scope, timing, and cost of the record of proceedings. The parties may stipulate to a partial record of proceedings that does not contain all the documents listed in subdivision (e) if approved by the court.

(2) The plaintiff or petitioner may elect to prepare the record of proceedings by providing a notice of the election to the public agency, or the parties may agree to an alternative method of preparation of the record of proceedings, subject to certification of its accuracy by the public agency, within the 60-day time limit specified in this subdivision.

(3) Notwithstanding paragraph (2), the public agency, within five business days of the receipt of the notice specified in paragraph (2), may deny the request of the plaintiff or petitioner to prepare the record of proceedings, in which case the public agency or the real party in interest shall bear the costs of preparation and certification of the record of proceedings, and those costs shall not be recoverable from the plaintiff or petitioner.

(c) The time limit
 established by subdivision (b) may be extended only upon the stipulation of all parties who have been properly served in the action or proceeding or upon order of the court. Extensions shall be liberally granted by the court when the size of the record of proceedings renders infeasible compliance with that time limit. There is no limit on the number of extensions that may be granted by the court, but no single extension shall exceed 60 days unless the court determines that a longer extension is in the public interest.

(d) If the public agency fails to prepare and certify the record of proceedings within the time limit established in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b), or any continuances of that time limit, the plaintiff or petitioner may move for sanctions, and the court may, upon that motion, grant appropriate sanctions.

(e) The record of proceedings shall include, but is not
 limited to, all of the following items:

(1) All project application materials.

(2) All staff reports and related documents prepared by the respondent public agency with respect to its compliance with the substantive and procedural requirements of this division and with respect to the action on the project.

(3) All staff reports and related documents prepared by the respondent public agency and written testimony or documents submitted by any person relevant to any findings or statement of overriding considerations adopted by the respondent agency pursuant to this division.

(4) Any transcript or minutes of the proceedings at which the decisionmaking body of the respondent public agency heard testimony on, or considered any environmental document on, the
 project, and any transcript or minutes of proceedings before any advisory body to the respondent public agency that were presented to the decisionmaking body before action on the environmental documents or on the project.

(5) All notices issued by the respondent public agency to comply with this division or with any other law governing the processing and approval of the project.

(6) All written comments received in response to, or in connection with, environmental documents prepared for the project, including responses to the notice of preparation.

(7) All written evidence or correspondence submitted to, or transferred from, the respondent public agency with respect to compliance with this division or with respect to the project.

(8) Any proposed
 decisions or findings submitted to the decisionmaking body of the respondent public agency by its staff, or the project proponent, project opponents, or other persons.

(9) The documentation of the final public agency decision, including the final environmental impact report, mitigated negative declaration, or negative declaration, and all documents, in addition to those referenced in paragraph (3), cited or relied on in the findings or in a statement of overriding considerations adopted pursuant to this division.

(10) (A) (i) Any other written materials relevant to the respondent public agency’s compliance with this division or to its decision on the merits of the project, including the initial study, any drafts of any
 environmental
 document or portions of the initial study or drafts that have been released for public review, and copies of studies or other documents relied upon in any environmental document prepared for the project and either made available to the public during the public review period or included in the respondent public agency’s files on the project, and all internal agency communications, including staff notes and memoranda related to the project or to compliance with this division, but not including communications that are of a logistical nature, such as meeting invitations and scheduling communications, except that any material that is subject to privileges contained in the Evidence Code, or exemptions contained in the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing
 with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code), shall not be included in the record of proceedings under this paragraph, consistent with existing law.

(ii) This subparagraph applies to a project that includes a distribution center or oil and gas infrastructure.

(B) (i) Any other written materials relevant to the respondent public agency’s compliance with this division or to its decision on the merits of the project, including the initial
 study, any drafts of any environmental document, or portions of the initial study or drafts, that have been released for public review, and copies of studies or other documents relied upon in any environmental document prepared for the project and either made available to the public during the public review period or included in the respondent public agency’s files on the project, and all internal agency communications, including memoranda related to the project or to compliance with this division, but not including communications that are of a logistical nature, such as meeting invitations and scheduling communications, except that any material that is subject to privileges contained in the Evidence Code, or exemptions contained in the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code), shall not be included in the record of proceedings under this paragraph, consistent with existing law.

(ii) This subparagraph applies to any project that is not subject to subparagraph (A).

(iii) For purposes of this subparagraph, internal agency communications does not include electronic internal agency communications, including emails, that were not presented to the final decisionmaking body, other than those communications and documents consulted, or reviewed by the lead agency executive or a local agency executive, as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 3511.1, or other administrative official in a supervisory role who is reviewing the project. The public agency may, but is not required to, include any documents in the record of proceedings that are not specifically set forth in this subparagraph.

(11) The full written record before any inferior administrative decisionmaking body whose decision was appealed to a superior administrative decisionmaking body before the filing of litigation.

(f) In preparing the record of proceedings, the party preparing the record of proceedings shall strive to do so at reasonable cost in light of the scope of the record of proceedings.

(g) The clerk of the superior court shall prepare and certify the clerk’s transcript on appeal not later than 60 days from the date that the notice designating the papers or records to be included in the clerk’s transcript was filed with the superior court, if the party or parties pay any costs or fees for the preparation of the clerk’s transcript imposed in conformance with any law or rules of court. Nothing in this subdivision precludes an election
 to proceed by appendix, as provided in Rule 8.124 of the California Rules of Court.

(h) Extensions of the period for the filing of any brief on appeal may be allowed only by stipulation of the parties or by order of the court for good cause shown. Extensions for the filing of a brief on appeal shall be limited to one 30-day extension for the preparation of an opening brief and one 30-day extension for the preparation of a responding brief, except that the court may grant a longer extension or additional extensions if it determines that there is a substantial likelihood of settlement that would avoid the necessity of completing the appeal.

(i) At the completion of the filing of briefs on appeal, the appellant shall notify the court of the completion of the filing of briefs, whereupon the clerk of the reviewing court shall set the appeal for hearing on the first available calendar
 date.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 24, Sec. 19.   (SB 131)   Effective June 30, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

21167.6.2.

(a) (1) Notwithstanding Section 21167.6, upon the written request of a project applicant received no later than 30 days after the date that the lead agency makes a determination pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 21080.1, Section 21094.5, or Chapter 4.2 (commencing with Section 21155) and with the consent of the lead agency as provided in subdivision (e), the lead agency shall prepare and certify the record of proceedings in the following manner:

(A) The lead agency for the project shall prepare the record of proceedings pursuant to this division concurrently with the administrative process.

(B) All documents and other materials placed in the record of proceedings shall be posted on, and be downloadable from, an internet website maintained by the lead agency commencing with the date of the release of the draft environmental document for the project. If the lead agency cannot maintain an internet website with the information required pursuant to this section, the lead agency shall provide a link on the agency’s internet website to that information.

(C) The lead agency shall make available to the public in a readily accessible electronic format the draft environmental document for the project, and all other documents submitted to, cited by, or relied on by the lead agency, in the preparation of the draft environmental document for the project.

(D) A document
 prepared by the lead agency or submitted by the applicant after the date of the release of the draft environmental document for the project that is a part of the record of the proceedings shall be made available to the public in a readily accessible electronic format within five business days after the document is released or received by the lead agency.

(E) The lead agency shall encourage written comments on the project to be submitted in a readily accessible electronic format, and shall make any comment available to the public in a readily accessible electronic format within five business days of its receipt.

(F) Within seven business days after the receipt of any comment that is not in an electronic format, the lead agency shall convert that comment into a readily accessible
 electronic format and make it available to the public in that format.

(G) The lead agency shall certify the record of proceedings within 30 days after the filing of the notice required pursuant to Section 21108 or 21152.

(2) This subdivision does not require the disclosure or posting of any trade secret as defined in Section 7924.510 of the Government Code, information about the location of archaeological sites or sacred lands, or any other information that is subject to the disclosure restrictions of any provision listed in Section 7920.505 of the Government Code.

(b) Any dispute regarding the record of proceedings prepared pursuant to this section shall be resolved by the court in an action or proceeding brought
 pursuant to subdivision (b) or (c) of Section 21167.

(c) The content of the record of proceedings shall be as specified in subdivision (e) of Section 21167.6.

(d) The negative declaration, mitigated negative declaration, draft and final environmental impact report, or other environmental document shall include a notice in no less than 12-point type stating the following:
“THIS DOCUMENT IS SUBJECT TO SECTION 21167.6.2 OF THE PUBLIC RESOURCES CODE, WHICH REQUIRES THE RECORD OF PROCEEDINGS FOR THIS PROJECT TO BE PREPARED CONCURRENTLY WITH THE ADMINISTRATIVE PROCESS; DOCUMENTS PREPARED BY, OR SUBMITTED TO, THE LEAD AGENCY TO BE POSTED ON THE LEAD AGENCY’S INTERNET WEBSITE,
 AND THE LEAD AGENCY TO ENCOURAGE WRITTEN COMMENTS ON THE PROJECT TO BE SUBMITTED TO THE LEAD AGENCY IN A READILY ACCESSIBLE ELECTRONIC FORMAT.”
(e) (1) The lead agency shall respond to a request by the project applicant within 10 business days from the date that the request pursuant to subdivision (a) is received by the lead agency.

(2) A project applicant and the lead agency may mutually agree, in writing, to extend the time period for the lead agency to respond pursuant to paragraph (1), but they shall not extend that period beyond the commencement of the public review period for the proposed negative declaration, mitigated negative declaration, draft environmental impact report, or other environmental document.

(3) The request to prepare a record of proceedings pursuant to
 this section shall be deemed denied if the lead agency fails to respond within 10 business days of receiving the request or within the time period agreed upon pursuant to paragraph (2), whichever ends later.

(f) The written request of the applicant submitted pursuant to subdivision (a) shall include an agreement to pay all of the lead agency’s costs of preparing and certifying the record of proceedings pursuant to this section and complying with the requirements of this section, in a manner specified by the lead agency.

(g) The costs of preparing the record of proceedings pursuant to this section and complying with the requirements of this section are not recoverable costs pursuant to Section 1032 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(h) Pursuant to subdivision (f) and Section 21089, the lead agency may charge and collect a reasonable fee from the person making the request pursuant to subdivision (a) to recover the costs incurred by the lead agency in preparing the record of proceedings pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 381.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Sec. 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------

21167.6.5.

(a) The petitioner or plaintiff shall name, as a real party in interest, the person or persons identified by the public agency in its notice filed pursuant to subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 21108 or Section 21152 or, if no notice is filed, the person or persons in subdivision (b) or (c) of Section 21065, as reflected in the agency’s record of proceedings for the project that is the subject of an action or proceeding brought pursuant to Section 21167, 21168, or 21168.5, and shall serve the petition or complaint on that real party in interest, by personal service, mail, facsimile, or any other method permitted by law, not later than 20 business days following service of the petition or complaint on the public agency.

(b) The public agency shall provide the
 petitioner or plaintiff, not later than 10 business days following service of the petition or complaint on the public agency, with a list of responsible agencies and a public agency having jurisdiction over a natural resource affected by the project.

(c) The petitioner or plaintiff shall provide the responsible agencies, and a public agency having jurisdiction over a natural resource affected by the project, with notice of the action or proceeding within 15 days of receipt of the list described in subdivision (b).

(d) Failure to name potential persons, other than those real parties in interest described in subdivision (a), is not grounds for dismissal pursuant to Section 389 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(e) This section is not intended to affect an existing right of a party to intervene in the
 action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 162, Sec. 151.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

21167.7.

Every person who brings an action pursuant to Section 21167 shall comply with the requirements of Section 388 of the Code of Civil Procedure. Every such person shall also furnish pursuant to Section 388 of the Code of Civil Procedure a copy of any amended or supplemental pleading filed by such person in such action to the Attorney General. No relief, temporary or permanent, shall be granted until a copy of the pleading has been furnished to the Attorney General in accordance with such requirements.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 664, Sec. 183.5.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

21167.8.

(a) Not later than 20 days from the date of service upon a public agency of a petition or complaint brought pursuant to Section 21167, the public agency shall file with the court a notice setting forth the time and place at which all parties shall meet and attempt to settle the litigation. The meeting shall be scheduled and held not later than 45 days from the date of service of the petition or complaint upon the public agency. The notice of the settlement meeting shall be served by mail upon the counsel for each party. If the public agency does not know the identity of counsel for any party, the notice shall be served by mail upon the party for whom counsel is not known.

(b) At the time and place specified in the notice filed with the court, the parties shall
 meet and confer regarding anticipated issues to be raised in the litigation and shall attempt in good faith to settle the litigation and the dispute that forms the basis of the litigation. The settlement meeting discussions shall be comprehensive in nature and shall focus on the legal issues raised by the parties concerning the project that is the subject of the litigation.

(c) The settlement meeting may be continued from time to time without postponing or otherwise delaying other applicable time limits in the litigation. The settlement meeting is intended to be conducted concurrently with any judicial proceedings.

(d) If the litigation is not settled, the court, in its discretion, may, or at the request of any party, shall, schedule a further settlement conference before a judge of the superior court. If the petition or complaint is later heard on its merits,
 the judge hearing the matter shall not be the same judge conducting the settlement conference, except in counties that have only one judge of the superior court.

(e) The failure of any party, who was notified pursuant to subdivision (a), to participate in the litigation settlement process, without good cause, may result in an imposition of sanctions by the court.

(f) Not later than 30 days from the date that notice of certification of the record of proceedings was filed and served in accordance with Section 21167.6, the petitioner or plaintiff shall file and serve on all other parties a statement of issues that the petitioner or plaintiff intends to raise in any brief or at any hearing or trial. Not later than 10 days from the date on which the respondent or real party in interest has been served with the statement of issues from the petitioner or plaintiff, each respondent and real party in interest shall file and serve on all other parties a statement of issues which that party intends to raise in any brief or at any hearing or trial.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 38, Sec. 2.   (AB 2965)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

21167.9.

Any action brought in the superior court relating to this division may be subject to a mediation proceeding conducted pursuant to Chapter 9.3 (commencing with Section 66030) of Division 1 of Title 7 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 699, Sec. 36.   (SB 894)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

21168.

Any action or proceeding to attack, review, set aside, void or annul a determination, finding, or decision of a public agency, made as a result of a proceeding in which by law a hearing is required to be given, evidence is required to be taken and discretion in the determination of facts is vested in a public agency, on the grounds of noncompliance with the provisions of this division shall be in accordance with the provisions of Section 1094.5 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

In any such action, the court shall not exercise its independent judgment on the evidence but shall only determine whether the act or decision is supported by substantial evidence in the light of the whole record.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1312.)
-------------------------------------------

21168.5.

In any action or proceeding, other than an action or proceeding under Section 21168, to attack, review, set aside, void or annul a determination, finding, or decision of a public agency on the grounds of noncompliance with this division, the inquiry shall extend only to whether there was a prejudicial abuse of discretion. Abuse of discretion is established if the agency has not proceeded in a manner required by law or if the determination or decision is not supported by substantial evidence.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1312.)
-------------------------------------------

21168.6.

In any action or proceeding under Sections 21168 or 21168.5 against the Public Utilities Commission the writ of mandate shall lie only from the Supreme Court to such commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1154.)
-------------------------------------------

21168.6.2.

(a) On and after January 1, 2027, and subject to subdivisions (b) and (c), for a project, located in a geographic area for which the Governor declared a state of emergency pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 8550) of Division 1 of Title 2 of the Government Code, that is to maintain, repair, restore, demolish, or replace property or facilities damaged or destroyed by wildfire, and the project is not otherwise exempt from this division by paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 21080 or by a Governor’s executive order,
 all of the following shall apply:

(1) The record of proceedings shall be prepared in accordance with the manner specified in subdivision (a) of Section 21167.6.2.

(2) (A) An action or proceeding brought to attack, review, set aside, void, or annul the certification of an environmental impact report, or the adoption of a negative declaration or mitigated negative declaration, for the project or the granting of any project approval, including any potential appeals to the court of appeal or the Supreme Court, shall, to the extent feasible, be resolved within 270 calendar days of the filing of the certified record of proceedings with the court.

(B) The Judicial Council
 shall adopt rules of court to implement subparagraph (A).

(3) The applicant shall agree to pay the costs of the trial court and the court of appeal in hearing and deciding any action or proceeding brought under this section in a form and manner as provided in a rule of court, that the Judicial Council shall adopt, which shall include, but not be limited to, the costs for the appointment of a special master if deemed appropriate by the court.

(b) (1) Subdivision (a) only applies to a project that is consistent with the applicable zoning and land use ordinances.

(2) Subdivision (a) does not apply to a project that is proposed after the Governor
 rescinds the declaration of the state of emergency for that geographic area.

(c) This section applies to projects in a geographic area that was damaged by fire for which the Governor has declared a state of emergency on or after January 1, 2023.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 550, Sec. 1.   (SB 676)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

21168.6.6.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:
